New York, session 2025-2026, S3422.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 13 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 13. Compensation of the governor. 1. Effective January first, two 4 thousand twenty-six, the governor of the state of New York shall have 5 the net payment of the governor's salary, as provided in article four of 6 the state constitution and fixed by the legislature, withheld and not 7 paid until legislative passage of the budget is complete, if the legis- 8 lative passage of the budget, as defined in subdivision two of this 9 section, has not occurred prior to the first day of any fiscal year. An 10 amount equal to the accrued, withheld and unpaid amount shall be prompt- 11 ly paid to the governor upon passage of the legislative budget. 12 2. For the purposes of this section: 13 (a) "net payment" shall mean gross salary minus any or all of the 14 following deductions: federal taxes, state taxes, social security taxes, 15 city taxes, payments on retirement loans, retirement contributions, 16 contributions to health insurance or other group insurance programs, 17 child support and court ordered payments; and 18 (b) "legislative passage of the budget" shall mean that the appropri- 19 ation bill or bills submitted by the governor pursuant to section three 20 of article seven of the state constitution have been finally acted on by 21 both houses of the legislature in accordance with article seven of the 22 state constitution and the state comptroller has determined that such 23 appropriation bill or bills that have been finally acted on by the 24 legislature are sufficient for the ongoing operation and support of 25 state government and local assistance for the ensuing fiscal year. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05527-01-5